Utah statutes.
79-5-301.   Guidelines for the establishment of trails.

In establishing trails, the division shall:

(1)  develop and manage the trails to harmonize with and complement any existing or planned land uses;

(2)  locate and design trails according to an overall plan that provides for:

(a)  interconnecting routes, where feasible; and

(b)  consideration of safety; and

(3)  select trails to minimize adverse effects on:

(a)  an adjacent landowner or user and the landowner's or user's property or operations;

(b)  wildlife; and

(c)  the natural environment.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 344, 2009 General Session

